services/web/node_modules/@overleaf/dictionaries/dictionaries/eu.aff
SET UTF-8

TRY hzsxaertkniouldgjbmpGCqFfDNBUPRAHOvWcEVyMLISQTKwJXñZY.

REP 36
REP z s
REP z x
REP s z
REP s x
REP x s
REP x z
REP z tz
REP x tx
REP s ts
REP tz z
REP tx x
REP ts s
REP 0 h
REP h 0
REP u o
REP o u
REP b p
REP d t
REP g k
REP p b
REP t d
REP k g
REP x j
REP j x
REP j g
REP g j
REP ll il
REP il ll
REP in ñ
REP ñ in
REP mb nb
REP mp np
REP nm mm
REP v b
REP t 0
REP ikan ik

NOSPLITSUGS

WORDCHARS .-

BREAK 1
BREAK -

FLAG num

NEEDAFFIX 1

PFX 1000 Y 1
PFX 1000 0 ba .
PFX 1001 Y 5
PFX 1001 d bait d
PFX 1001 g baik g
PFX 1001 0 bai n
PFX 1001 0 bai l
PFX 1001 0 bait [^dgnl]
PFX 1002 Y 3
PFX 1002 h berr h
PFX 1002 0 berr [aeiou]
PFX 1002 0 bir [^haeiou]
SFX 344 Y 76
SFX 344 0 0 .
SFX 344 0 a .
SFX 344 0 ago .
SFX 344 0 ago/1,360 .
SFX 344 0 ak .
SFX 344 0 an .
SFX 344 0 arekin .
SFX 344 0 areki/1,368 .
SFX 344 0 aren .
SFX 344 0 arendako .
SFX 344 0 arentzat .
SFX 344 0 arentza/1,368 .
SFX 344 0 aren/1,369 .
SFX 344 0 ari .
SFX 344 0 az .
SFX 344 0 a/1,370 .
SFX 344 0 dun .
SFX 344 0 dun/1,371 .
SFX 344 0 ean .
SFX 344 0 egi .
SFX 344 0 egi/1,360 .
SFX 344 0 ei .
SFX 344 0 ek .
SFX 344 0 ekin .
SFX 344 0 eki/1,368 .
SFX 344 0 eko .
SFX 344 0 eko/1,376 .
SFX 344 0 en .
SFX 344 0 endako .
SFX 344 0 entzat .
SFX 344 0 entza/1,368 .
SFX 344 0 en/1,372 .
SFX 344 0 era .
SFX 344 0 eraino .
SFX 344 0 eraino/1,368 .
SFX 344 0 erantz .
SFX 344 0 erantz/1,378 .
SFX 344 0 eranz/1,368 .
SFX 344 0 erat .
SFX 344 0 era/1,379 .
SFX 344 0 er/1,381 .
SFX 344 0 eta/1,373 .
SFX 344 0 etik .
SFX 344 0 eti/1,368 .
SFX 344 0 ez .
SFX 344 0 ez/1,368 .
SFX 344 0 e/1,380 .
SFX 344 0 gatik .
SFX 344 0 gati/1,368 .
SFX 344 0 i .
SFX 344 0 ik .
SFX 344 0 ki .
SFX 344 0 ki/1,374 .
SFX 344 0 oi .
SFX 344 0 ok .
SFX 344 0 okin .
SFX 344 0 oki/1,368 .
SFX 344 0 on .
SFX 344 0 ontzat .
SFX 344 0 ontza/1,368 .
SFX 344 0 on/1,369 .
SFX 344 0 otaz .
SFX 344 0 ota/1,373 .
SFX 344 0 oz .
SFX 344 0 pe .
SFX 344 0 pe/1,377 .
SFX 344 0 tasun .
SFX 344 0 tasun/1,361 .
SFX 344 0 txo .
SFX 344 0 txo/1,367 .
SFX 344 0 tzar .
SFX 344 0 tzarr/1,382 .
SFX 344 0 tzar/1,383 .
SFX 344 0 tzat .
SFX 344 0 tza/1,368 .
SFX 344 0 xe/1,384 .
SFX 345 Y 7
SFX 345 0 0 .
SFX 345 0 ela .
SFX 345 0 ela/1,368 .
SFX 345 0 en .
SFX 345 0 enean .
SFX 345 0 enerako .
SFX 345 0 en/1,410 .
SFX 346 Y 13
SFX 346 0 0 .
SFX 346 0 ek .
SFX 346 0 ekin .
SFX 346 0 eki/1,368 .
SFX 346 0 en .
SFX 346 0 endako .
SFX 346 0 entzat .
SFX 346 0 entza/1,368 .
SFX 346 0 en/1,369 .
SFX 346 0 eta/1,373 .
SFX 346 0 ez .
SFX 346 0 ez/1,368 .
SFX 346 0 i .
SFX 347 Y 34
SFX 347 0 0 .
SFX 347 0 an .
SFX 347 0 ekin .
SFX 347 0 eki/1,368 .
SFX 347 0 en .
SFX 347 0 en/1,369 .
SFX 347 0 e/1,380 .
SFX 347 0 k .
SFX 347 0 ko .
SFX 347 0 koa .
SFX 347 0 koak .
SFX 347 0 koa/1,375 .
SFX 347 0 ko/1,376 .
SFX 347 0 ra .
SFX 347 0 raino .
SFX 347 0 raino/1,368 .
SFX 347 0 rantz .
SFX 347 0 rantz/1,378 .
SFX 347 0 ranz/1,368 .
SFX 347 0 rat .
SFX 347 0 ra/1,379 .
SFX 347 0 rendako .
SFX 347 0 rentzat .
SFX 347 0 rentza/1,368 .
SFX 347 0 ri .
SFX 347 0 r/1,381 .
SFX 347 0 taz .
SFX 347 0 ta/1,373 .
SFX 347 0 tik .
SFX 347 0 ti/1,368 .
SFX 347 0 tzat .
SFX 347 0 tza/1,368 .
SFX 347 0 z .
SFX 347 0 z/1,368 .
SFX 340 Y 27
SFX 340 0 0 .
SFX 340 0 dura .
SFX 340 0 dura/1,357 .
SFX 340 0 dur/1,358 .
SFX 340 0 garri .
SFX 340 0 garri/1,359 .
SFX 340 0 keran .
SFX 340 0 men .
SFX 340 0 mendu .
SFX 340 0 mendu/1,360 .
SFX 340 0 men/1,361 .
SFX 340 0 pe .
SFX 340 0 pen .
SFX 340 0 pen/1,361 .
SFX 340 0 pe/1,377 .
SFX 340 0 raz .
SFX 340 0 raz/1,362 .
SFX 340 0 tu .
SFX 340 0 tu/1,363 .
SFX 340 0 tzaile .
SFX 340 0 tzaile/1,364 .
SFX 340 0 tze .
SFX 340 0 tzear .
SFX 340 0 tzeke .
SFX 340 0 tzen .
SFX 340 0 tzen/1,365 .
SFX 340 0 tze/1,366 .
SFX 341 Y 19
SFX 341 0 0 .
SFX 341 0 garri .
SFX 341 0 garri/1,359 .
SFX 341 0 men .
SFX 341 0 mendu .
SFX 341 0 mendu/1,360 .
SFX 341 0 men/1,361 .
SFX 341 0 pen .
SFX 341 0 pen/1,361 .
SFX 341 0 taraz .
SFX 341 0 taraz/1,362 .
SFX 341 0 tu .
SFX 341 0 tu/1,363 .
SFX 341 0 tze .
SFX 341 0 tzear .
SFX 341 0 tzeke .
SFX 341 0 tzen .
SFX 341 0 tzen/1,365 .
SFX 341 0 tze/1,366 .
SFX 342 Y 66
SFX 342 0 0 .
SFX 342 0 ño .
SFX 342 0 ño/1,385 .
SFX 342 0 a .
SFX 342 0 ago .
SFX 342 0 ago/1,360 .
SFX 342 0 ak .
SFX 342 0 an .
SFX 342 0 arekin .
SFX 342 0 areki/1,368 .
SFX 342 0 aren .
SFX 342 0 arendako .
SFX 342 0 arentzat .
SFX 342 0 arentza/1,368 .
SFX 342 0 aren/1,369 .
SFX 342 0 ari .
SFX 342 0 az .
SFX 342 0 a/1,370 .
SFX 342 0 dun .
SFX 342 0 dun/1,371 .
SFX 342 0 ei .
SFX 342 0 ek .
SFX 342 0 ekin .
SFX 342 0 eki/1,368 .
SFX 342 0 en .
SFX 342 0 endako .
SFX 342 0 entzat .
SFX 342 0 entza/1,368 .
SFX 342 0 en/1,369 .
SFX 342 0 eta/1,373 .
SFX 342 0 ez .
SFX 342 0 e/1,380 .
SFX 342 0 gatik .
SFX 342 0 gati/1,368 .
SFX 342 0 gile .
SFX 342 0 gile/1,360 .
SFX 342 0 i .
SFX 342 0 ik .
SFX 342 0 ka .
SFX 342 0 ka/1,368 .
SFX 342 0 oi .
SFX 342 0 ok .
SFX 342 0 okin .
SFX 342 0 oki/1,368 .
SFX 342 0 on .
SFX 342 0 ontzat .
SFX 342 0 ontza/1,368 .
SFX 342 0 on/1,369 .
SFX 342 0 otaz .
SFX 342 0 ota/1,373 .
SFX 342 0 oz .
SFX 342 0 pe .
SFX 342 0 pe/1,377 .
SFX 342 0 ra .
SFX 342 0 raino .
SFX 342 0 raino/1,368 .
SFX 342 0 rantz .
SFX 342 0 rantz/1,378 .
SFX 342 0 ranz/1,368 .
SFX 342 0 rat .
SFX 342 0 ra/1,379 .
SFX 342 0 r/1,381 .
SFX 342 0 tsu .
SFX 342 0 tsu/1,359 .
SFX 342 0 z .
SFX 342 0 z/1,368 .
SFX 343 Y 16
SFX 343 0 k .
SFX 343 0 ko .
SFX 343 0 koa .
SFX 343 0 koak .
SFX 343 0 koa/1,370 .
SFX 343 0 ko/1,386 .
SFX 343 0 ta/1,373 .
SFX 343 0 tik .
SFX 343 0 ti/1,368 .
SFX 343 0 txo .
SFX 343 0 txo/1,385 .
SFX 343 0 tzar .
SFX 343 0 tzarr/1,387 .
SFX 343 0 tzar/1,383 .
SFX 343 0 tzat .
SFX 343 0 tza/1,368 .
SFX 348 Y 28
SFX 348 0 0 .
SFX 348 0 ean .
SFX 348 0 ek .
SFX 348 0 ekin .
SFX 348 0 eki/1,368 .
SFX 348 0 eko .
SFX 348 0 eko/1,376 .
SFX 348 0 en .
SFX 348 0 endako .
SFX 348 0 entzat .
SFX 348 0 entza/1,368 .
SFX 348 0 en/1,369 .
SFX 348 0 era .
SFX 348 0 eraino .
SFX 348 0 eraino/1,368 .
SFX 348 0 erantz .
SFX 348 0 erantz/1,378 .
SFX 348 0 eranz/1,368 .
SFX 348 0 erat .
SFX 348 0 era/1,379 .
SFX 348 0 er/1,381 .
SFX 348 0 eta/1,373 .
SFX 348 0 etik .
SFX 348 0 eti/1,368 .
SFX 348 0 ez .
SFX 348 0 ez/1,368 .
SFX 348 0 e/1,380 .
SFX 348 0 i .
SFX 349 Y 28
SFX 349 0 0 .
SFX 349 0 k .
SFX 349 0 ko .
SFX 349 0 koa .
SFX 349 0 koak .
SFX 349 0 koa/1,375 .
SFX 349 0 ko/1,376 .
SFX 349 0 ra .
SFX 349 0 raino .
SFX 349 0 raino/1,368 .
SFX 349 0 rantz .
SFX 349 0 rantz/1,378 .
SFX 349 0 ranz/1,368 .
SFX 349 0 rat .
SFX 349 0 ra/1,379 .
SFX 349 0 rendako .
SFX 349 0 rentzat .
SFX 349 0 rentza/1,368 .
SFX 349 0 ri .
SFX 349 0 r/1,381 .
SFX 349 0 taz .
SFX 349 0 ta/1,373 .
SFX 349 0 tik .
SFX 349 0 ti/1,368 .
SFX 349 0 tzat .
SFX 349 0 tza/1,368 .
SFX 349 0 z .
SFX 349 0 z/1,368 .
SFX 298 Y 28
SFX 298 0 0 .
SFX 298 0 garren .
SFX 298 0 garren/1,395 .
SFX 298 0 gatik .
SFX 298 0 gati/1,368 .
SFX 298 0 k .
SFX 298 0 ko .
SFX 298 0 koa .
SFX 298 0 koak .
SFX 298 0 koa/1,370 .
SFX 298 0 ko/1,392 .
SFX 298 0 na .
SFX 298 0 naka .
SFX 298 0 naka/1,368 .
SFX 298 0 na/1,368 .
SFX 298 0 rekin .
SFX 298 0 reki/1,368 .
SFX 298 0 ren .
SFX 298 0 rendako .
SFX 298 0 rentzat .
SFX 298 0 rentza/1,368 .
SFX 298 0 ren/1,369 .
SFX 298 0 re/1,380 .
SFX 298 0 ri .
SFX 298 0 rik .
SFX 298 0 ta/1,373 .
SFX 298 0 tzat .
SFX 298 0 tza/1,368 .
