services/web/node_modules/@overleaf/dictionaries/dictionaries/eu.dic
absorba/1002,2,1
afrikar/1002,17,1
ahopil/1002,7,1
akata/1002,2,1
aldizka/1002,2,1
ames/1002,107,1
antzezta/1002,2,1
arbitra/1002,2,1
arra-igor/1002,154,1
arrotz/1002,109,1
astinaraz/1002,113,1
atzen/1002,7,1
aurrizkizta/1002,2,1
azken/1002,153,1
bake/1002,17,1
bare/1002,17,1
bazterrera/1002,3,1
bekizkigu/1001,1000
bela/1002,2,1
beramakiate/1001,1000
beroki/1002,17,1
berrosa/1002,2,1
betza/1001,1000
bihi/1002,17,1
birbalora/1002,3,1
biziago/1002,17,1
brida/1002,2,1
dabilzkik/1001,1000,227,1
dakarkiok/1001,1000,227,1
dakik/1001,1000,227,1
damuko/1002
darabilkied/1001,1000,225,1
darakuskigu/1001,1000,226,1
daramazkiguzu/1001,1000,226,1
datozkid/1001,1000,225,1
degiod/1001,1000,225,1
deporta/1002,2,1
deritzozue/1001,1000,226,1
desegoki/1002,17,1
desinteresa/1002,2,1
desmaia/1002,2,1
desputz/1002,109,1
didate/1001,1000,226,1
diezana/1001,1000,228,1
digua/1001,1000,224,1
dikta/1002,2,1
dinake/1001,1000,223,1
diotsozak/1001,1000,227,1
ditizketek/1001,1000
dizkied/1001,1000,225,1
dizkiona/1001,1000,224,1
doazkieee/1001,1000,228,1
dolora/1002,3,1
ederr/1002,4,1
ekarzkidazu/1001,1000
ekidin/1002,143,1
emakume/1002,17,1
enperadore/1002,17,1
erakustazue/1001,1000
eranta/1002,2,1
eres/1002,17,1
erra/1002,255,1
errekrea/1002,2,1
errima/1002,2,1
esadak/1001,1000
esklerosa/1002,2,1
espero/1002,263,1
etor/1002,156,1
ezinbide/1002,17,1
fida/1002,2,1
frantses/1002,112,1
gainindarge/1002,17,1
gaitizten/1001,1000
gale/1002,17,1
garraizkizu/1001,1000,226,1
gatiba/1002,2,1
genbilzkien/1001,1000,232,1
genekarkionan/1001,1000
generabilkionan/1001,1000
generamazkioan/1001,1000
gengozkinake/1001,1000,223,1
geniharduke/1001,1000,223,1
geniotsun/1001,1000,232,1
genizkizuen/1001,1000,232,1
gentxezkiekee/1001,1000,224,1
gerta/1002,2,1
ginderabiltzakezun/1001,1000,232,1
gindezaguzkizun/1001,1000,232,1
gintuzkean/1001,1000,232,1
gintzakea/1001,1000,224,1
goganbehar/1002,5,1
gora/1002,3,1
guduka/1002
haizara/1002,3,1
harri/1002,17,1
hatorkioke/1001,1000,223,1
hautes/1002,127,1
hekarkieke/1001,1000,223,1
henkigu/1001,1000,228,1
herakutsazke/1001,1000,223,1
hert/1002,109,1
hien/1001,1000,232,1
hinderamaten/1001,1000,232,1
hinduketen/1001,1000,232,1
hiotsekeze/1001,1000,224,1
hirriki/1002,17,1
hiru/298,1
hormatarteka/1002,2,1
ibilka/1002,2,1
iezazkidazu/1001,1000
ihe/1002,17,1
immuniza/1002,2,1
inka/1002,2,1
intzigi/1002,17,1
irakatsazkion/1001,1000
irents/1002,126,1
itoka/1002
izenezta/1002,2,1
jarki/1002,160,1
ji/1002,144,1
kamuts/1002,109,1
karraska/1002,2,1
ke/1002,17,1
kofra/1002,2,1
konfesionaldu/1002,17,1
kontrasta/1002,2,1
kostuma/1002,2,1
kurtsa/1002,2,1
lanbera/1002,3,1
lastozta/1002,2,1
lau/1002,298,1
lehorr/1002,4,1
lekarkioke/1001,1000,223,1
leramakete/1001,1000,226,1
letxekieke/1001,1000,223,1
liezazkidake/1001,1000,223,1
likin/1002,7,1
liotseketez/1001,1000,223,1
lizkidaken/1001,1000
lorezta/1002,2,1
luzes/1002,127,1
maloka/1002,2,1
marmar/1002
mehas/1002,107,1
miaz/1002,133,1
mugikida/1002,2,1
mutina/1002,2,1
nagok/1001,1000
nasai/1002,17,1
natorrek/1001,1000
negiake/1001,1000,223,1
nekarzkian/1001,1000,227,1
nengokien/1001,1000,232,1
nentxekinake/1001,1000,223,1
nerakutsazkee/1001,1000,224,1
neroaan/1001,1000
niezazkio/1001,1000,228,1
ninderabilnan/1001,1000,232,1
nindiken/1001,1000
ninduke/1001,1000,223,1
nintzatekeen/1001,1000,232,1
nirauan/1001,1000
nizkizun/1001,1000,232,1
oilarr/1002,4,1
orobat/1002,109,1
parti/1002,17,1
plaini/1002,17,1
propizia/1002,2,1
sardaka/1002,2,1
soil/1002,7,1
tanuzta/1002,2,1
tramita/1002,2,1
txerbel/1002,7,1
uka/1002,340,1
uler/1002,341,1
uma/1002,2,1
ur/1002,341,1
volapük/342,1
volapü/343,1
xeda/1002,2,1
xoin/344,1
zabiltza/1001,1000,226,1
zaieke/1001,1000,223,1
zaitez/1001,1000,345,1
zaizkiguken/1001,1000
zakizkiat/1001,1000
zarabilzkinagu/1001,1000
zaroatzanagu/1001,1000
zarpail/1002,7,1
zatzaizkigu/1001,1000,226,1
zebilkina/1001,1000,224,1
zegietean/1001,1000
zegizkiguten/1001,1000,232,1
zegokizun/1001,1000,232,1
zekarkinate/1001,1000,224,1
zekarzkioguk/1001,1000
zekizkio/1001,1000,228,1
zenbait/346,1
zenegiketen/1001,1000,232,1
zenekarzkieten/1001,1000,232,1
zenerabiltzate/1001,1000,224,1
zeneramazkigukee/1001,1000,224,1
zengozkidan/1001,1000,232,1
zenigukee/1001,1000,224,1
zeniotsokeen/1001,1000,232,1
zenizkiokeen/1001,1000,232,1
zentxezkigukee/1001,1000,224,1
zerabilkigukeen/1001,1000,232,1
zeramakioagu/1001,1000
zerbaitxo/347,1
zerbait/348,1
zerbaixka/349,1
zerion/1001,1000,232,1
zerraizkigun/1001,1000,232,1
zertxobait/348,1
zeukanagu/1001,1000
zieketek/1001,1000
zigorr/1002,4,1
zihardukate/1001,1000,224,1
zindekuskitete/1001,1000,224,1
zinduzkatete/1001,1000,226,1
zioskuketen/1001,1000,232,1
ziraunagu/1001,1000
zitzaizkizuen/1001,1000,232,1
zizkionagu/1001,1000
zolara/1002,3,1
zonbait/346,1
zonbeit/346,1
